test/src/morphology/N-laepsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - läpš: # Noun 211 'eng /est laps/fin' - full paradigm
     läpš+N+Sg+Nom: läpš
     läpš+N+Sg+Gen: laps
     läpš+N+Sg+Par: lapstā
     läpš+N+Sg+Dat: lapsõn
     läpš+N+Sg+Ins: lapsõks
     läpš+N+Sg+Ill: lapsõ
     läpš+N+Sg+Ela: lapsõst
     läpš+N+Pl+Nom: lapst
     läpš+N+Pl+Gen: lapst
     läpš+N+Pl+Par: läpši
     läpš+N+Pl+Dat: lapstõn
     läpš+N+Pl+Ins: lapstkõks
     läpš+N+Pl+Ill: läpšīz
     läpš+N+Pl+Ela: läpšīst
